Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-145.01
Department of Correctional Services; sale and production of braille materials; authorized.

The Department of Correctional Services may sell braille books and materials produced by offenders confined in facilities of the department. The department may enter into contracts for the use of the services of such offenders to produce braille books and materials. The department may also service any braille machinery needed to produce braille products.

Laws 1983, LB 594, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 547;

Laws 2002, LB 951, § 1.